Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-7431
Board, defined.

Board means the Board of Pharmacy.

Laws 1992, LB 1019, § 5;

Laws 1999, LB 828, § 176;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-7405;

Laws 2006, LB 994, § 5.